Hawaii statutes.
[§11-343] Reporting deadline. When
any reporting deadline falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday designated in
section 8-1, the reporting deadline shall be the next succeeding day that is
not a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next